Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2495
Compromise of claims.

When a claim against the estate has been presented, the personal representative may, if it appears for the best interest of the estate, compromise the claim, whether due or not due, absolute or contingent, liquidated or unliquidated.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 173, UPC § 3-813.